Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1.
Administration and enforcement of title.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Commissioner of Public Safety shall cooperate in carrying out all the statutes and rules adopted to implement the provisions of this title to achieve the most efficient and economical administration. In case of disagreement as to division of work, the Governor shall decide.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 129.

§ 2.
Application to trailers, semi-trailers, and trailer coaches.

The provisions of this title in relation to registration, certificates of registration, refund of registration fees, duplicates of certificates of registration and number plates, and times of registration and transfers of registration and the duration thereof, for motor vehicles shall apply also to trailers and semi-trailers.

The provisions of this title applicable to motor vehicles, trailers, and semi-trailers shall be applicable to trailer coaches unless otherwise specifically provided or clearly inapplicable.

§ 3.
Application to common carriers.

Sections 4(34), 921, 1075, 1281, 1281a, 1282, and 1283 of this title shall not apply to a Type I school bus owned or operated by a common carrier.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 102

, § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.